apertium-hbs.hbs.metadix
    <pardef n="zrakoplov__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>â</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="jun__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>â</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>i</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pop__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ova</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ovâ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ove</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="snop__n">
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>a</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l></l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>e</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>u</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>om</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ova</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ovâ</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ove</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovi</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ovima</l><r><s n="n"/><s n="mi"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="du/h__n"><!--Long and short plural--><!--Sibilarisation in plural and vocative--><!-- -še vocative-->
      <e><p><l>h</l><r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ha</l><r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hu</l><r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ha</l><r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>še</l><r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hu</l><r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hom</l><r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hovi</l><r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>si</l><r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hova</l><r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ha</l><r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hovima</l><r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>sima</l><r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hove</l><r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>he</l><r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hovi</l><r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>si</l><r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hovima</l><r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>sima</l><r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>hovima</l><r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>sima</l><r>h<s n="n"/><s n="ma"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="pregled"><i>pregled</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ideal"><i>ideal</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="okoliš"><i>okoliš</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="marš"><i>marš</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="okvir"><i>okvir</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="savez"><i>savez</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="porez"><i>porez</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="porez na dohodak"><i>porez</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/><p><l><b/>na<b/>dohodak</l><r><g><b/>na<b/>dohodak</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="fond"><i>fond</i><par n="snop__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pop"><i>pop</i><par n="pop__n"/></e>
    <e lm="štab"><i>štab</i><par n="snop__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rod"><i>rod</i><par n="snop__n"/></e>
    <e lm="trend"><i>trend</i><par n="snop__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kolovoz"><i>kolovoz</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="avion"><i>avion</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kriminal"><i>kriminal</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="listopad"><i>listopad</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="januar"><i>januar</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="februar"><i>februar</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mart"><i>mart</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="april"><i>april</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="maj"><i>maj</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="avgust"><i>avgust</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jun"><i>jun</i><par n="jun__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jul"><i>jul</i><par n="jun__n"/></e>
    <e lm="zrakoplov"><i>zrakoplov</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="koralj"><i>koralj</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prorez"><i>prorez</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="temelj"><i>temelj</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="proces"><i>proces</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="region"><i>region</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pogled"><i>pogled</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="izbor"><i>izbor</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="razgovor"><i>razgovor</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="karakter"><i>karakter</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kompjuter"><i>kompjuter</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kompjutor"><i>kompjutor</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="promjer"><i>promjer</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="softver"><i>softver</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="odgovor" a="slasher"><i>odgovor</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rad"><i>rad</i><par n="snop__n"/></e>
    <e lm="duh"><i>du</i><par n="du/h__n"/></e>
    <e lm="transfer"><i>transfer</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stožer"><i>stožer</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="doticaj"><i>doticaj</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="izvještaj"><i>izvještaj</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nasrtaj"><i>nasrtaj</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="očaj"><i>očaj</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pištolj"><i>pištolj</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="preodgoj"><i>preodgoj</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ustroj"><i>ustroj</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sadržaj"><i>sadržaj</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uzgoj"><i>uzgoj</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uzgoj riba"><i>uzgoj</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/><p><l><b/>riba</l><r><g><b/>riba</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="ulov"><i>ulov</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uređaj"><i>uređaj</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="okoliš"><i>okoliš</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="uvoz"><i>uvoz</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="izvoz"><i>izvoz</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kapital"><i>kapital</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skandal"><i>skandal</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skandalčić"><i>skandalčić</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šrapnel"><i>šrapnel</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mandat"><i>mandat</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ured"><i>ured</i><par n="zrakoplov__n"/></e>
